Colorado, session 2026A, HB1181.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 12-105-126 as
follows:
12-105-126. Repeal of article - review of functions.
This article 105 is repealed, effective September 1, 2026 SEPTEMBER
1, 2033. Before the repeal, the functions of the director and the advisory
committee created in section 12-105-106 are scheduled for review in
accordance with section 24-34-104.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-34-104, repeal
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(27)(a)(I); and add (34)(a)(XIV) as follows:
24-34-104. General assembly review of regulatory agencies and
functions for repeal, continuation, or reestablishment - legislative
declaration - repeal.
(27) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2026:
(I) The regulation of barbers, hairstylists, cosmetologists,
estheticians, nail technicians, and registered places of business under
section 12-105-112 by the director of the division of professions and
occupations in accordance with article 105 of title 12;
(34) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2033:
(XIV) THE REGULATION OF BARBERS, HAIRSTYLISTS,
COSMETOLOGISTS, ESTHETICIANS, NAIL TECHNICIANS, AND REGISTERED
PLACES OF BUSINESS UNDER SECTION 12-105-112 BY THE DIRECTOR OF THE
DIVISION OF PROFESSIONS AND OCCUPATIONS IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE
105 OF TITLE 12.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-105-106, repeal (2)
as follows:
12-105-106. Powers and duties of the director.
(2) The director shall appoint a six-member advisory committee to
assist in the performance of the director's duties. The advisory committee
consists of at least three licensees who have expertise in the area under
review; one owner or operator of a school that provides training for
licensees in the industry and is licensed by the private occupational school
division; a representative from a Colorado licensed school that provides
training for licensees in the industry; and a member of the public. Members
of the advisory committee shall not be compensated for their services but
shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties under this article 105. The advisory committee
shall meet at least once per year and prior to the adoption of rules, and at the
request of the director.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1181

SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-105-107, amend (3)
as follows:
12-105-107. Examinations.
(3) The examinations must be consistent with the practical and
theoretical requirements of the practices of barbering, hairstyling, or
cosmetology or providing nail technician or esthetician services as provided
by this article 105, and the director shall review, revise, and update the
examinations periodically on a reasonable basis. in consultation with the
advisory committee created pursuant to section 12-105-106. Examinations
must be graded promptly, and the results of the examinations must be made
available to the applicants promptly. The examination EXAMINATIONS must
emphasize health and safety issues.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-105-104, amend
(2), (7), (8) introductory portion, (8)(d), and (9)(c); and add (8)(e) as
follows:
12-105-104. Definitions.
As used in this article 105, unless the context otherwise requires:
(2) "Barbering" means any one or combination of the following
practices when done upon the upper part of the human body for cosmetic
purposes and not for the treatment of disease or physical or mental ailments
and when done for payment either directly or indirectly or when done
without payment for the public generally:
(a) Shaving or trimming the beard;
(b) Cutting the hair;
(c) Giving facial or scalp massage or PROVIDING SCALP treatment
with oils, creams, or lotions or other chemical preparations, either by hand
or with mechanical appliances;
(d) Dyeing the Hair LIGHTENING AND COLORING or applying hair
tonic; OR
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1181

(e) Applying cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, powders, oils, clays,
or lotions to the scalp, face, neck, or shoulders.
(7) (a) "Cosmetology" means any one AN act or practice, or any A
combination of acts or practices, not for the treatment of disease, A physical
illness, or a behavioral, mental health, or substance use disorder, when done
for payment either directly or indirectly or when done without payment for
the public generally, usually performed by and included in or known as the
profession of beauty culturists, beauty operators, beauticians, estheticians,
cosmetologists, or hairdressers or of any other person, INCLUDING A
partnership, corporation, or other legal entity holding itself out as practicing
cosmetology by whatever designation and within the meaning of this article
105. In particular,
(b) "Cosmetology" includes, but is not limited to, any one or a
combination of the following acts or practices:
(I) Arranging, dressing, curling, waving, cleansing, cutting,
singeing, bleaching LIGHTENING, coloring, TRIMMING, or similar work upon
the hair OR FACIAL HAIR of a person by any means; and, with hands or a
mechanical or electrical apparatus or appliance or by the use of cosmetic or
chemical preparations;
(II) TRIMMING OF THE BEARD OR MUSTACHE;
(III) Manicuring or pedicuring the nails of a person WITH HANDS, A
MECHANICAL OR ELECTRICAL APPARATUS OR APPLIANCE, OR BY USING
COSMETIC OR CHEMICAL PREPARATIONS;
(IV) Giving facials, applying makeup, giving skin care, or applying
eyelashes involving physical contact with a person;
(V) Beautifying the face, neck, arms, bust, or torso of the human
body by use of cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions, or creams;
(VI) Massaging, cleaning, or stimulating the face, neck, arms, bust,
or torso of the human body with the use of antiseptics, tonics, lotions, or
creams;
(VII) Removing superfluous hair from the body, FACE, OR NECK of
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1181

a person by the use of depilatories or waxing or by the use of tweezers; and
the trimming of the beard OR
(VIII) PROVIDING BODY WRAPS TO A PERSON BY APPLYING OILS,
CREAMS, MASKS, SCRUBS, ANTISEPTICS, CLAYS, LOTIONS, OR OTHER
PREPARATIONS.
(8) "Esthetician" means any A person who engages in any one or
more of the following practices not for the treatment of disease or physical
ailments:
(d) Removing superfluous hair from the body, FACE, OR NECK of any
A person by the use of depilatories or waxing or by the use of tweezers; OR
(e) PROVIDING BODY WRAPS TO A PERSON BY APPLYING OILS,
CREAMS, MASKS, SCRUBS, ANTISEPTICS, CLAYS, LOTIONS, OR OTHER
PREPARATIONS.
(9) "Hairstyling" means providing one or more of the following hair
care services, not for the treatment of disease or physical or mental
ailments, upon the upper part of the human body for cosmetic purposes for
payment either directly or indirectly, or when done without payment for the
public generally:
(c) Cutting, arranging, applying hair extensions to, or styling the hair
by any means using the hands or with manual, mechanical, or electrical
implements or appliances;
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-105-118, amend
(1)(a); and add (3) as follows:
12-105-118. Exemptions.
(1) Nothing in this article 105 prohibits services by:
(a) A person who is acting within the scope of practice for which he
or she is THEY ARE licensed, registered, or certified;
(3) THIS ARTICLE 105 DOES NOT APPLY TO THE FOLLOWING
INDIVIDUALS OR SERVICES:
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1181

(a) MORTUARY SCIENCE PROFESSIONALS, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
12-135-103 (22.3), WHO PERFORM SERVICES ON DECEASED PERSONS;
(b) TATTOO ARTISTS WHO PERFORM COSMETIC TATTOOING ON THE
FACE, INCLUDING THE PRACTICE KNOWN AS "MICROBLADING" EYEBROWS;
(c) ELECTROLOGISTS OR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO PERFORMS
ELECTROLYSIS FOR THE REMOVAL OF HAIR;
(d) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS EMPLOYED TO PROVIDE HAIR AND
MAKEUP SERVICES FOR THEATRICAL, TELEVISION, OR MOTION PICTURE
PRODUCTIONS;
(e) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO PREPARES HAIR COLOR FOR A CLIENT TO USE
AT HOME;
(f) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO PROVIDES FREE HAIRCUTS OR FREE WASHING
AND SETTING OF HAIR FOR A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION;
(g) A PERSON THAT PROVIDES BARBERING AND COSMETOLOGY
SERVICES WITHIN CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES;
(h) A PERSON THAT PROVIDES MAKEUP APPLICATION SERVICES; OR
(i) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO POLISHES NAILS.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-105-125, amend (1)
introductory portion and (1)(b) as follows:
12-105-125. Grounds for discipline.
(1) The director may take disciplinary or other action as authorized
in section 12-20-404 upon proof that the A licensee:
(b) Made any misstatement on his or her THEIR application for
licensure to practice as a barber, hairstylist, cosmetologist, esthetician, or
nail technician or attempted to obtain a license to practice by fraud,
deception, or misrepresentation;
SECTION 8. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1181

takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1181